Washington statutes.
RCW 7.36.140

Duty of courts when federal question is raised.

In the consideration of any petition for a writ of habeas corpus by the supreme court or the court of appeals, whether in an original proceeding or upon an appeal, if any federal question shall be presented by the pleadings, it shall be the duty of the supreme court to determine in its opinion whether or not the petitioner has been denied a right guaranteed by the Constitution of the United States.

[ 1971 c 81 s 32; 1947 c 256 s 2; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 1085-2.]